Tennessee, session 114, SB1590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-104, is amended by:
(1) Deleting "Buffalo River — The entire river, except that portion which lies
within Wayne, Perry, Humphreys and Lewis counties" and substituting "Buffalo River —
The entire river";
(2) Deleting "Duck River — That segment of the Duck River beginning at Iron
Bridge Road at river mile 136.4 extending continuously to a point upstream to the
boundary of Marshall County at river mile 173.7.";
(3) Deleting "Duck River — That segment of the Duck River beginning at
Industrial Park Road approximately at river mile 128 extending continuously to a point
downstream to the boundary of Hickman County at approximately river mile 98
downstream from the Natchez Trace River Bridge" and substituting "Duck River — The
entire river except that segment of the river designated by the Tennessee Valley
Authority as part of Normandy Reservoir"; and
(4) Adding the following under the designation "Class II Pastoral River Areas":
Beaverdam Creek – That segment beginning with the confluence of
Brush Fork and Piney Fork in Hickman County and ending with its confluence
with the Duck River in Hickman County.
Lick Creek – That segment beginning with the confluence of North Fork
Lick Creek and South Fork Lick Creek in Williamson County and ending with its
confluence with the Duck River in Hickman County.
SB1590
010778
- 1 -

Piney River – That segment beginning with the confluence of the West
Piney River and the East Piney River in Dickson County and ending with its
confluence with the Duck River in Hickman County.
Swan Creek – That segment beginning with the confluence of Dry Branch
and Swan Creek in Hickman County and ending with its confluence with the
Duck River in Hickman County.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-108(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the phrase "of Duck River" and replacing it with "of any river".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010778